California, session 20252026, AB1596.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6370.7 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:6370.7. (a) On and after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2032, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, infant car seats.(b) For purposes of this section, “infant car seats” means a child restraint device or booster seat that meets the national highway traffic safety administration standard for child restraint systems under Section 571.213 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(c) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.(d) For the purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The specific goal, purpose, and objective that the exemption will achieve is to ease the high cost of living endured by California families and enhance the affordability of child safety products.(2) Detailed performance indicators measuring whether the exemption meets the goal, purpose, and objective described in paragraph (1) are the following:(A) The number of taxpayers utilizing the exemption of the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, infant car seats.(B) The total dollar amount exempted from gross receipts under this section.(3) On or before March 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall analyze the performance indicators in paragraph (2) to the extent information is available, and shall report its findings, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature.(e) This section shall remain operative only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Notwithstanding Section 2230 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, no appropriation is made by this act and the state shall not reimburse any local agency for any sales and use tax revenues lost by it under this act.SEC. 3. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.